Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3 EMISSIONS INSPECTION
42-4-307.5. Clean screen authority - enterprise - revenue bonds.

If the commission determines pursuant to section 42-4-306 (23)(b) to implement an expanded clean screen program in the enhanced emissions program area, there shall be created a clean screen authority consisting of the executive director of the department of public health and environment and executive director of the department of revenue or their designees and any necessary support staff. The authority shall constitute an enterprise for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution so long as it retains the authority to issue revenue bonds and receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), C.R.S., from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as it constitutes an enterprise pursuant to the provisions of this section, the authority shall not be a district for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The authority may, by resolution that meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section, authorize and issue revenue bonds in an amount not to exceed five million dollars in the aggregate for expenses of the authority. Such bonds may be issued only after approval by both houses of the general assembly acting either by bill or joint resolution and after approval by the governor in accordance with section 39 of article V of the state constitution. Such bonds shall be payable only from moneys allocated to the authority for expenses of the division and the commission pursuant to sections 42-4-306 and 42-4-307.

All bonds issued by the authority shall provide that:

No holder of any such bond may compel the state or any subdivision thereof to exercise its appropriation or taxing power; and

The bond does not constitute a debt of the state and is payable only from the net revenues allocated to the authority for expenses as designated in such bond.

The interest rate or rates on, and the denomination or denominations of, the bonds; and

The medium of payment of the bonds and the place where the bonds will be paid.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under the terms of this section shall state:

(I) The date of issuance of the bonds;

(II) A maturity date or dates during a period not to exceed thirty years from the date of issuance of the bonds;

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under the terms of this section may:

State that the bonds are to be issued in one or more series;

State a rank or priority of the bonds; and

Provide for redemption of the bonds prior to maturity, with or without premium.

Any bonds issued pursuant to the terms of this section may be sold at public or private sale. If bonds are to be sold at a public sale, the authority shall advertise the sale in such manner as the authority deems appropriate. All bonds issued pursuant to the terms of this section shall be sold at a price not less than the par value thereof, together with all accrued interest to the date of delivery.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, all bonds issued pursuant to this section are negotiable.

A resolution pertaining to issuance of bonds under this section may contain covenants as to:

(I) The purpose to which the proceeds of sale of the bonds may be applied and to the use and disposition thereof;

(II) Such matters as are customary in the issuance of revenue bonds including, without limitation, the issuance and lien position of other or additional bonds; and

(III) Books of account and the inspection and audit thereof.

Any resolution made pursuant to the terms of this section shall be deemed a contract with the holders of the bonds, and the duties of the authority under such resolution shall be enforceable by any appropriate action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Bonds issued under this section and bearing the signatures of the authority in office on the date of the signing shall be deemed valid and binding obligations regardless of whether, prior to delivery and payment, any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon have ceased to be members of the authority.

Except as otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the bonds, all bonds of the same issue under this section shall have a prior and paramount lien on the net revenues pledged therefor. The authority may provide for preferential security for any bonds, both principal and interest, to be issued under this section to the extent deemed feasible and desirable by such authority over any bonds that may be issued thereafter.

Bonds of the same issue or series issued under this section shall be equally and ratably secured, without priority by reason of number, date, sale, execution, or delivery, by a lien on the net revenue pledged in accordance with the terms of the resolution authorizing the bonds.

The clean screen authority shall be a government-owned business that provides financial services to all entities providing inspection services, the department, and the department of public health and environment with regard to the revenues subject to section 42-3-304 (19).

The clean screen authority may accept grants from any source and shall deposit such moneys in the clean screen fund created in section 42-3-304 (19).

The clean screen authority may contract with the department and expend moneys from the clean screen fund for computer programming costs associated with implementation of House Bill 01-1402, enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-third general assembly. The department is authorized to expend moneys pursuant to such contract, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, effective the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2000.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 1016, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 2005:

(9) and (10) amended, p. 1174, § 13, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(12) added, p. 1026, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (12)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (12), effective July 1, 2008. (See

L. 2006, p. 1026

.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 278, Session Laws of Colorado 2001. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act enacting subsection (12), see section 1 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

42-4-307.7. Vehicle emissions testing - remote sensing.

Repealed.

The Colorado department of transportation shall work with the department of public health and environment to identify locations that may accommodate unmanned remote sensing devices without causing a safety hazard.

The commission shall evaluate options for increasing the number of vehicles passing a test under the clean screen program, including, but not limited to:

The reduction of the number of remote sensing measurements per vehicle;

Additional remote sensing devices and sites;

Expanded hours of operation; and

Additional staffing.

The department of public health and environment shall work with the contractor to minimize false test results and shall track and report to the commission its progress in minimizing false test results on or before March 31 of each year.

The commission shall determine the criteria used for the measurement of vehicle emissions needed to comply with the clean screen program, which criteria shall include, but are not limited to, the pollutants measured, acceptable levels of the measured pollutants, and failure rates. Criteria adopted by the commission for the clean screen program shall meet environmental protection agency requirements.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Photographs of a vehicle taken by a remote sensing device in order to capture an image of a vehicle's license plate shall be limited to the rear of the vehicle. No attempts shall be made by a remote sensing device to photograph a vehicle's driver.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1026, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(13) added, (SB 09-003), ch. 322, p. 1717, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2012:

(1), (2), and (7) to (11) repealed and (6) amended, (SB 12-034), ch. 107, p. 364, § 4, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (13)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (13), effective December 31, 2009. (See

L. 2009, p. 1717

.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

42-4-308. Inspection and readjustment stations - inspection-only facilities - fleet inspection stations - motor vehicle dealer test facilities - contractor - emissions inspectors - emissions mechanics - requirements.

Applications for an inspection and readjustment station license, an inspection-only facility license, a fleet inspection station license, a motor vehicle dealer test facility license, an emissions inspector license, an enhanced inspection center license, or an emissions mechanic's license shall be made on forms prescribed by the executive director.

No inspection and readjustment station license, inspection-only facility license, fleet inspection station license, motor vehicle dealer test facility license, or enhanced inspection center license shall be issued unless the executive director finds that the facilities of the applicant are of adequate size and properly equipped as provided in subsection (3) of this section, that a licensed inspector or emissions mechanic, whichever is applicable, is or will be available to make such inspection, and that the inspection and readjustment procedures will be properly followed based upon established performance criteria pursuant to section 42-4-306 (4)(c).

No inspection or adjustments shall be made pursuant to the automobile inspection and readjustment program nor certification of emissions control issued unless the owner or operator of the inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, motor vehicle dealer test facility, or enhanced inspection center at which such inspection is made or such adjustments or repairs are performed as required has been issued, and is then operating under, a valid inspection and readjustment station license, inspection-only facility license, fleet inspection station license, motor vehicle dealer test facility license, or a contract for an authorized enhanced inspection center and has one or more licensed emissions inspectors or emissions mechanics employed as required, one of whom shall have made the inspection for which said certification has been issued.

No inspection and readjustment station license, inspection-only facility license, fleet inspection station license, motor vehicle dealer test facility license, or contractor's contract shall be issued or executed unless the station or contractor has proper equipment to meet licensing, facility, or contractor approval requirements. Such equipment shall include all test equipment approved by the commission to perform emissions inspections corresponding to the type of licensed or approved facility together with such auxiliary tools, equipment, and testing devices as are required by the commission by rule.

No emissions inspector license or emissions mechanic license shall be issued to any applicant unless said applicant has completed the required training, has demonstrated necessary skills and competence in the inspection of motor vehicles by passing the written certification test developed by the commission and administered by the department of public health and environment, and has demonstrated such skill and competence as a prerequisite to initial licensing by the department of revenue.

The department of revenue shall monitor emissions inspector and emissions mechanic activities at inspection and readjustment stations, inspection-only facilities, fleet inspection stations, motor vehicle dealer test facilities, and enhanced inspection centers during periodic performance audits conducted as prescribed by section 42-4-305.

An emissions inspector or emissions mechanic license may be revoked in accordance with section 42-4-305 if the licensee is not in compliance with the minimum performance criteria set forth by the commission or the department of revenue.

Licenses shall be valid for two years.

Emissions inspector and emissions mechanic license renewal shall be subject to the requirements set forth by the commission through rule and regulation.

Source:

L. 94:

(4)(a) amended, p. 2812, § 586, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2294, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-4-309. Vehicle fleet owners - motor vehicle dealers - authority to conduct inspections - fleet inspection stations - motor vehicle dealer test facilities - contracts with licensed inspection-only entities.

Any person in whose name twenty or more motor vehicles, required to be inspected, are registered in this state or to whom said number of vehicles are leased for a period of not less than six continuous months and who operates a motor vehicle repair garage or shop adequately equipped and manned, as required by section 42-4-308 and the rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto, may be licensed to perform said inspections as a fleet inspection station. Said inspections shall be made by licensed emissions inspectors or emissions mechanics. Such stations shall be subject to all licensing regulations and supervision applicable to inspection and readjustment stations. Fleet inspection stations shall inspect fleet vehicles in accordance with applicable requirements pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. No person licensed pursuant to this section may conduct emissions inspections on motor vehicles owned by employees of such person or the general public, but only on those vehicles owned or operated by the person subject to the fleet inspection requirements. Any such motor vehicles are not eligible for a certificate of emissions waiver and shall be inspected annually. The commission shall promulgate such rules as may be necessary to establish non-loaded mode static idle inspection procedures, standards, and criteria under this section.

Each fleet operator licensed or operating within the enhanced program area who is also licensed to operate a fleet inspection station shall assure that a representative sample of one-half of one percent or one vehicle, whichever is greater, of such operator's vehicle fleet is inspected annually at an inspection-only facility or enhanced inspection center. An analysis of the data gathered from any such inspection shall be performed by the department of public health and environment and provided to the department of revenue to determine compliance by such fleet with the self-inspection requirements of this section. An inspection is not required prior to the sale of a motor vehicle with at least twelve months remaining before the vehicle's certification of emissions compliance expires if such certification was issued when the vehicle was new.

As an alternative to subsection (1) of this section, any person having twenty or more vehicles registered in this state that are required to be inspected pursuant to section 42-4-310 may contract for periodic inspection services with a contractor or an inspection-only facility. Such inspections shall be in compliance with non-fleet vehicle requirements as specified in this part 3 and shall be performed by an authorized or licensed emissions inspector who shall be subject to all requirements and oversight as applicable.

Upon retail sale of any vehicle subject to fleet inspection to a party other than a fleet operator, such vehicle shall be inspected at an authorized enhanced inspection center, licensed inspection-only facility, or licensed inspection and readjustment station, as applicable. A certificate of emissions compliance shall be required as a condition of the retail sale of any such vehicle.

Any person licensed as a motor vehicle dealer pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44 in whose name twenty or more motor vehicles are registered or inventoried or consigned for retail sale in this state that are required to be inspected shall comply with the requirements of section 42-4-310 for the issuance of a certificate of emissions compliance at the time of the retail sale of the vehicle.

Within the enhanced emissions program, motor vehicle dealers licensed pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44 may contract for used motor vehicle inspection services by a licensed motor vehicle dealer test facility. Pursuant to rules of the commission, inspection procedures shall include a loaded mode transient dynamometer test cycle in combination with appropriate idle short tests.

1981 and older model vehicles held in inventory and offered for retail sale by a used vehicle dealer may be inspected by a licensed inspection-only facility.

Within the basic emissions program, any person licensed as a motor vehicle dealer pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44 may be licensed to conduct inspections pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a fleet or motor vehicle dealer test facility from participating in the basic or enhanced emissions program pursuant to this part 3 with the requirements of such program being determined by the county of residence or operation.

Motor vehicle dealers selling any vehicle to be registered in the enhanced program area shall comply with the enhanced program requirements.

Motor vehicle dealers selling any vehicle to be registered in the basic program area shall comply with the basic program requirements.

If used motor vehicles for sale have been inspected by a motor vehicle dealer test facility, the motor vehicle dealer shall comply with the standards and requirements established for motor vehicle dealer test facilities.

On and after June 1, 1996, a motor vehicle dealer or a used motor vehicle dealer licensed pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44 that sells any vehicle subject to the enhanced emissions program may comply with sections 42-4-304 (3)(d) and 42-4-310 by providing the consumer of the vehicle a voucher purchased by the dealer from the contractor for the centralized enhanced emissions program, with or without charge to the consumer, up to the maximum amount charged for an emissions inspection at an enhanced inspection center. The voucher shall cover the cost of an emissions inspection of the vehicle at an enhanced inspection center and shall entitle the consumer to such an emissions inspection.

If a vehicle inspected with a voucher as authorized in this paragraph (b) fails a test at an enhanced inspection center and is returned within three business days after its purchase, the dealer, at its option, shall repair the motor vehicle to pass the emissions test, pay the consumer to obtain such repairs to pass the emissions test from a third party, or repurchase the vehicle at the vehicle's purchase price. After such payment, repair, or repurchase, a dealer shall have no further liability to the consumer for compliance with the requirements of the enhanced emissions program.

The voucher to be delivered at time of sale shall set forth the conditions described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (6) on a form prescribed by the department of revenue.

A motor vehicle dealer shall have a motor vehicle inspected annually pursuant to section 42-4-310, but shall not be required to have such vehicle inspected more than once a year.

Source:

L. 94:

(1)(b) amended, p. 2812, § 587, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2296, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(6) added, p. 1352, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(b) amended and (7) added, p. 1603, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(3)(a), (3)(b), (3)(d), and (6)(a) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2066, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1724, § 88, effective May 29; (3)(a), (3)(b), (3)(d), and (6)(a) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 141, § 18, effective October 1.